Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 1. In General

§§ 36-8-101 and 36-8-102.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5.

Cross references. —

As to property destruction and defacement, see §

6-3-201

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1937, ch. 103, § 7 and Laws 1957, ch. 118, § 1, prohibited damage to property and littering, respectively.

§ 36-8-103.
Removal of plants or structures prohibited; exception.

No unauthorized person shall, in any manner, remove any tree, shrub, plant, flower, or other attraction of nature within a state park, campground, recreational ground, historical landmark or historical site, nor shall any person disturb any structure therein except with the written permission of the state agency having jurisdiction of the area.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 118, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-126; Laws 1963, ch. 117, § 3; 1982, ch. 75, § 2.

§ 36-8-104.
Use of firearms, fireworks, explosives and weapons prohibited; exceptions.

The use of firearms, fireworks, explosives and weapons of all kinds is prohibited in all state parks, campgrounds, recreational grounds, historic landmarks or historic sites providing, however, that:

Firearms and weapons that otherwise comply with state law may be used at such times and in such places as the Wyoming game and fish commission may designate; and

A supervised public fireworks display may be held in a state park that is not subject to an open fire ban if the fireworks operator has obtained both a special use permit from the superintendent of the park, pursuant to department rules and regulations, and a permit for the display pursuant to W.S.

35-10-203

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 118, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-127; Laws 1963, ch. 117, § 4; 2004, ch. 19, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(ii), redesignating the existing provisions as (a) and (a)(i) and making related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 36-8-105.
Penalty for violating W.S. 36-8-103 through 36-8-105.

Any person violating the provisions of this law shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon the conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00). Each and every county and state law enforcement officer, game wardens, deputy game wardens of the Wyoming game and fish commission and the director of the department of state parks and cultural resources shall enforce the provisions of this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 118, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 36-128; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 36-8-106.
Supervision of museums; legends and historical information.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the department of state parks and cultural resources shall in consultation with the commission, supervise and control any and all museums which are established in the state parks, public recreational grounds, public campgrounds, historic landmarks or historic sites of Wyoming. All items, objects, furnishings and information in any such museum shall be prepared and arranged under the direction of the department of state parks and cultural resources. All museum employees shall be furnished by and be under the direction of such department. The care, maintenance and upkeep of the interior of such museum and outside maintenance of buildings and grounds shall be the responsibility of the department.

All legends and historical information placed on any historic landmark or historic site shall be prepared or approved by the department. The department shall also provide all historical and interpretive material to be used both on the approaches to and at historic sites and landmarks within the state.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 117, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 36-128.1; Laws 1990, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 55, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to establishment of parks and cultural resources commission, see §

36-4-101

.

As to county museums, see chapter 10 of title 18.

§ 36-8-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1963, ch. 117, § 10, related to transfer of appropriations, records and powers.